District of Columbia statutes.
8-301

Duty to remove weeds 4 inches in height; notice; penalties for failure to comply; adjudications.

It shall be the duty of the owner, occupant, or agent in charge of any land in the City of Washington, or in the more densely populated suburbs of said City, to remove from such land any weeds thereon of 4 or more inches in height within 7 days (Sundays and legal holidays excepted) after notice from the Director of the Department of Human Services so to do, and upon failure to comply with such notice he or she shall, on conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than $10 for each day said notice is not complied with. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this section, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this section shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Mar. 1, 1899, 30 Stat. 959, ch. 326, § 1
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 471, 32 DCR 4450

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-303.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1101.
1973 Ed., § 6-901.

Editor's Notes

Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.